Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-109
Commercial trailer, defined.

Commercial trailer means any trailer or semitrailer which has a gross weight, including load thereon, of more than nine thousand pounds and which is designed, used, or maintained for the transportation of persons or property for hire, compensation, or profit or designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property. Commercial trailer does not include cabin trailers, farm trailers, fertilizer trailers, or utility trailers.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 9.